Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2423
Special assessment; notice of appeal; time; bond; costs.

The owner appealing shall, within ten days from the levy of such special assessment, file a notice of appeal with the city or village clerk, and shall post a bond in the amount of two hundred dollars conditioned that such appeal shall be prosecuted without delay and the appellant shall pay all costs charged against him.

Laws 1975, LB 468, § 2.

Plaintiffs did not waive their right to contest the assessment for a sanitary sewer extension district by failing to file notice of appeal within 10 days of the levy. Plaintiffs attacked the formation of the district, not the amount of assessments that have been levied against their property. A special assessment is subject to collateral attack for a fundamental defect. Christensen v. City of Tekamah, 230 Neb. 576, 432 N.W.2d 798 (1988).